California statutes. Labor Code
(C) A garment manufacturing employer, which, for purposes of this section, has the same meaning as “contractor,” as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 2671.

(3) “Employing unit” has the same meaning as defined in Section 135 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(4) “Client” and “customer” mean the person with whom a temporary services employer has a contractual relationship to provide the services of one or more individuals employed by the temporary services employer.

(b) (1) (A) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, if an
 employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client, that employee’s wages are due and payable no less frequently than weekly, regardless of when the assignment ends, and wages for work performed during any calendar week shall be due and payable not later than the regular payday of the following calendar week. A temporary services employer shall be deemed to have timely paid wages upon completion of an assignment if wages are paid in compliance with this subdivision.

(B) Except as provided in paragraphs (2) to (5), inclusive, if an employee of a temporary services employer in the security services industry is a security guard who is registered pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 7580) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, is employed by a private patrol operator licensed pursuant to that chapter, and is assigned to work for a client, that employee’s wages are due and payable no less frequently
 than weekly, regardless of when the assignment ends, and wages for work performed during any workweek, as defined under Section 500, shall be due and payable not later than the regular payday of the following workweek.

(2) If an employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client on a day-to-day basis, that employee’s wages are due and payable at the end of each day, regardless of when the assignment ends, if each of the following occurs:

(A) The employee reports to or assembles at the office of the temporary services employer or other location.

(B) The employee is dispatched to a client’s worksite each day and returns to or reports to the office of the temporary services employer or other location upon completion of the assignment.

(C) The employee’s work is not executive, administrative, or professional, as defined in the wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission, and is not clerical.

(3) If an employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client engaged in a trade dispute, that employee’s wages are due and payable at the end of each day, regardless of when the assignment ends.

(4) If an employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client and is discharged by the temporary services employer or leasing employer, wages are due and payable as provided in Section 201.

(5) If an employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client and quits his or her employment with the temporary services employer, wages are due and payable as provided in Section 202.

(6) If an employee of a temporary services employer is assigned to work for a client for over 90 consecutive calendar days, this section does not apply unless the temporary services employer pays the employee weekly in compliance with paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(c) A temporary services employer who violates this section is subject to the civil penalties provided for in Section 203 and to any other penalties available at law.

(d) This section shall not be interpreted to limit any rights or remedies otherwise available under state or federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 561, Sec. 142.   (AB 1516)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

201.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “An employee engaged in the production or broadcasting of motion pictures” means an employee to whom both of the following apply:

(A) The employee’s job duties relate to or support the production or broadcasting of motion pictures or the facilities or equipment used in the production or broadcasting of motion pictures.

(B) The employee is hired for a period of limited duration to render services relating to or supporting a particular motion picture production or broadcasting project, or is hired on the basis of one or more daily or weekly calls.

(2) “Daily or weekly call” means an employment that, by its terms, will expire at the conclusion of one day or one week, unless renewed.

(3) “Next regular payday” means the day designated by the employer, pursuant to Section 204, for payment of wages earned during the payroll period in which the termination occurs.

(4) “Production or broadcasting of motion pictures” means the development, creation, presentation, or broadcasting of theatrical or televised motion pictures, television programs, commercial advertisements, music videos, or any other moving images, including, but not limited to, productions made for entertainment, commercial, religious, or educational purposes, whether these productions are presented by means of film, tape, live broadcast, cable, satellite transmission, Web cast, or any other technology that is now in use or may be adopted in the future.

(b) An employee engaged in the production or broadcasting of motion pictures whose employment terminates is entitled to receive payment of the wages earned and unpaid at the time of the termination by the next regular payday.

(c) The payment of wages to employees covered by this section may be mailed to the employee or made available to the employee at a location specified by the employer in the county where the employee was hired or performed labor. The payment shall be deemed to have been made on the date that the employee’s wages are mailed to the employee or made available to the employee at the location specified by the employer, whichever is earlier.

(d) For purposes of this section, an employment terminates when the employment relationship ends, whether by discharge, lay off, resignation, completion of employment for a specified term, or otherwise.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits the parties to a valid collective bargaining agreement from establishing alternative provisions for final payment of wages to employees covered by this section if those provisions do not exceed the time limitation established in Section 204.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 824, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

201.6.

(a) As used in this section:

(1) “Print shoot employee” means an individual hired for a period of limited duration to render services relating to or supporting a still image shoot, including film or digital photography, for use in print, digital, or internet media.

(2) “Next regular payday” means the day designated by the employer, pursuant to Section 204, for payment of wages earned during the payroll period in which the termination occurs.

(3) “Time of termination” is when the employment relationship ends, whether by discharge, layoff, resignation,
 completion of employment for a specified term, or otherwise.

(b) A print shoot employee is entitled to receive payment of the wages earned and unpaid at the time of termination by the next regular payday.

(c) The payment of wages to employees covered by this section may be mailed to the employee or made available to the employee at a location specified by the employer in the county where the employee was hired or performed labor. The payment shall be deemed to have been made on the date that the employee’s wages are mailed to the employee or made available to the employee at the location specified by the employer, whichever is earlier.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits the parties to a valid collective
 bargaining agreement from establishing alternative provisions for final payment of wages to employees covered by this section if those provisions do not exceed the time limitation established in Section 204.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 253, Sec. 2.   (SB 671)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

201.7.

An employer who lays off an employee or a group of employees engaged in the business of oil drilling shall be deemed to have made immediate payment within the meaning of Section 201 if the wages of such employees are paid within such reasonable time as may be necessary for computation or payment thereof; provided, however, that such reasonable time shall not exceed 24 hours after discharge excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays; and provided further, such payment may be mailed and the date of mailing is the date of payment.

The Legislature finds and determines that special provision must be made for the payment of wages on discharge of employees engaged in oil drilling because their employment at various locations is often far removed from the employer’s principal administrative offices, which makes the computation and payment of wages on an immediate basis unduly burdensome.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 440.)
-------------------------------------------

201.8.

(a) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Events employee” means an employee of an owner, operator, affiliate, licensee, vendor, concessions operator, lessee, tenant, or subtenant of a professional baseball venue or professional baseball team, or one of their respective contractors or subcontractors, who works in any capacity during any event held at a professional baseball venue, unless the employee is hired for a specified, limited, period of time, and the employee has no expectation of an ongoing employment relationship.

(2) For purposes of this section, “event” means any event, whether public or private, that is held at a professional
 baseball venue, including all professional and amateur sports events, games, concerts, shows, performances, conventions, or other entertainment events.

(3) “Professional baseball venue” means any venue where professional baseball games regularly are played.

(4) “Next regular payday” means the day designated by the employer of an events employee, pursuant to Section 204, for payment of wages earned during the payroll period, except where the events employee is discharged by the employer or where the events employee quits the employment.

(b) An events employee is entitled to receive payment of the wages earned and unpaid by the next regular payday, unless an events employee is discharged by the employer or the events employee quits the employment, in which case payment of final wages is governed by Sections 201 and
 202, respectively.

(c) The payment of wages to an events employee covered by this section may be mailed to the events employee, paid by direct deposit to an account designated by the events employee, or made available to the events employee at a location specified by the employer in the county where the events employee was hired or performed labor. The payment shall be deemed to have been made on the date that the events employee’s wages are mailed to the events employee, directly deposited, or made available to the events employee at the location specified by the employer, whichever is earlier.

(d) Events employees shall be deemed to be employed continuously and without interruption until their employment is terminated either by the employer or the events employee. The conclusion of an event or series of events (whether it is a single game, concert, or event, or a series of games
 in a homestand, or the end of the season for a professional baseball team), by itself, does not constitute a discharge, termination, layoff, or any other type of break in service.

(e) Nothing in this section prohibits the parties to a valid collective bargaining agreement from establishing alternative provisions for payment of wages to events employees covered by this section if those provisions do not exceed the time limitation established in Section 204.

(f) Nothing in this section should be read to affect the interpretation or application of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1251) of Chapter 5 of Part 1 of Division 1 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, including Section 1253.8 of that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 700, Sec. 1.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

201.9.

Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 201, if employees are employed at a venue that hosts live theatrical or concert events and are enrolled in and routinely dispatched to employment through a hiring hall or other system of regular short-term employment established in accordance with a bona fide collective bargaining agreement, these employees and their employers may establish by express terms in their collective bargaining agreement the time limits for payment of wages to an employee who is discharged or laid off.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 685, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

202.

(a) If an employee not having a written contract for a definite period quits his or her employment, his or her wages shall become due and payable not later than 72 hours thereafter, unless the employee has given 72 hours previous notice of his or her intention to quit, in which case the employee is entitled to his or her wages at the time of quitting. Notwithstanding any other law, an employee who quits without providing a 72-hour notice shall be entitled to receive payment by mail if he or she so requests and designates a mailing address. The date of the mailing shall constitute the date of payment for purposes of the requirement to provide payment within 72 hours of the notice of quitting.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law,
 the state employer shall be deemed to have made an immediate payment of wages under this section for any unused or accumulated vacation, annual leave, holiday leave, sick leave to which the employee is otherwise entitled due to a disability retirement, or time off to which the employee is entitled by reason of previous overtime work where compensating time off was given by the appointing power, provided at least five workdays prior to his or her final day of employment, the employee submits a written election to his or her appointing power authorizing the state employer to tender payment for any or all leave to be contributed on a pretax basis or a Roth basis, in the year of separation, to the employee’s account in a state-sponsored supplemental retirement plan as described under Sections 401(k), 403(b), or 457 of the Internal Revenue Code provided the plan allows those contributions. The contribution shall be deposited into the employee’s 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account no later than two and one-half
 months after the employee’s final day of employment. This section is not intended to authorize contributions in excess of the annual deferral limits imposed under federal and state law or the provisions of the supplemental retirement plan itself.

(c) Notwithstanding any other law, when a state employee quits, retires, or disability retires from his or her employment with the state, the employee may, at least five workdays prior to his or her final day of employment, submit a written election to his or her appointing power authorizing the state employer to defer into the next calendar year payment of any or all of the employee’s unused or accumulated vacation, annual leave, holiday leave, sick leave to which the employee is otherwise entitled due to a disability, retirement, or time off to which the employee is entitled by reason of previous overtime work where compensating time off was given by the appointing power. The employee may elect any
 of the following:

(1) Contribute the entire payment to his or her 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account.

(A) This election is only available if the employee’s last day of employment is on or after November 1 of the calendar year of his or her last day of employment.

(B) The contributions shall be deposited into the applicable plan account no later than two and one-half months after the employee’s last day of employment.

(2) Contribute any portion of the deferred payment to his or her 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account and receive cash payment for the remaining noncontributed unused leave.

(A) An employee is eligible to defer a portion of the deferred payment into a 401(k), 403(b), or 457
 plan account only if the employee’s last day of employment was on or after November 1 of the calendar year of his or her last day of employment.

(B) For the portion deferred into a 401(k), 403(b), or 457 plan account, the contributions shall be deposited into an applicable plan account no later than two and one-half months after the employee’s last day of employment.

(C) For the portion received as a cash payment:

(i) Only that portion of leave that extends past the November pay period for the employee shall be deferred into the next calendar year.

(ii) Payments shall be tendered under this paragraph no later than February 1 in the year following the employee’s last day of employment.

(3) Receive a lump-sum payment for all of the deferred unused leave as described above.

(A) Only that portion of leave that extends past the November pay period for the employee shall be deferred into the next calendar year.

(B) Payments shall be tendered under this section no later than February 1 in the year following the employee’s last day of employment.

 (d) This section is not intended to authorize contributions in excess of the annual deferral limits imposed under federal and state law or the provisions of the supplemental retirement plan itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 903, Sec. 20.   (SB 1504)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

203.

(a) If an employer willfully fails to pay, without abatement or reduction, in accordance with Sections 201, 201.3, 201.5, 201.6, 201.8, 201.9, 202, and 205.5, any wages of an employee who is discharged or who quits, the wages of the employee shall continue as a penalty from the due date thereof at the same rate until paid or until an action therefor is commenced; but the wages shall not continue for more than 30 days. An employee who secretes or absents themselves to avoid payment to
 them, or who refuses to receive the payment when fully tendered to them, including any penalty then accrued under this section, is not entitled to any benefit under this section for the time during which the employee so avoids payment.

(b) Suit may be filed for these penalties at any time before the expiration of the statute of limitations on an action for the wages from which the penalties arise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 700, Sec. 2.5.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

203.1.

If an employer pays an employee in the regular course of employment or in accordance with Section 201, 201.3, 201.5, 201.6, 201.7, 201.8, or 202 any wages or fringe benefits, or both, by check, draft or voucher, which check, draft or voucher is subsequently refused payment because the employer or maker has no account with the bank, institution, or person on which the instrument is drawn, or has insufficient funds in the account upon which the instrument is drawn at the time of its presentation, so long as the same is presented within 30 days of receipt by the employee of the check, draft or
 voucher, those wages or fringe benefits, or both, shall continue as a penalty from the due date thereof at the same rate until paid or until an action therefor is commenced. However, those wages and fringe benefits shall not continue for more than 30 days and this penalty shall not apply if the employer can establish to the satisfaction of the Labor Commissioner or an appropriate court of law that the violation of this section was unintentional. This penalty also shall not apply in any case in which an employee recovers the service charge authorized by Section 1719 of the Civil Code in an action brought by the employee thereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 700, Sec. 3.5.   (SB 286)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

203.5.

(a) If a bonding company issuing a bond which secures the payment of wages for labor or the surety on a bond willfully fails to pay, without abatement or reduction, any verified claim made for wages found to be due and payable, the claim for wages shall continue as a penalty against the bonding company or surety from the date on which demand for payment was made at the same rate until paid as the wages upon which the claim is based, except that the claim shall not continue as a penalty for more than 30 days.

(b) This section shall not apply to contractor’s bonds required pursuant to Section 7071.6 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1281, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

204.

(a) All wages, other than those mentioned in Section 201, 201.3, 202, 204.1, or 204.2, earned by any person in any employment are due and payable twice during each calendar month, on days designated in advance by the employer as the regular paydays. Labor performed between the 1st and 15th days, inclusive, of any calendar month shall be paid for between the 16th and the 26th day of the month during which the labor was performed, and labor performed between the 16th and the last day, inclusive, of any calendar month, shall be paid for between the 1st and 10th day of the following month. However, salaries of executive, administrative, and professional employees of employers covered by the Fair Labor Standards Act, as set forth pursuant to Section 13(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act, as
 amended through March 1, 1969, in Part 541 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that part now reads or may be amended to read at any time hereafter, may be paid once a month on or before the 26th day of the month during which the labor was performed if the entire month’s salaries, including the unearned portion between the date of payment and the last day of the month, are paid at that time.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, all wages earned for labor in excess of the normal work period shall be paid no later than the payday for the next regular payroll period.

(2) An employer is in compliance with the requirements of subdivision (a) of Section 226 relating to total hours worked by the employee, if hours worked in excess of the normal work period during the current pay period are itemized as corrections on the paystub
 for the next regular pay period. Any corrections set out in a subsequently issued paystub shall state the inclusive dates of the pay period for which the employer is correcting its initial report of hours worked.

(c) However, when employees are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that provides different pay arrangements, those arrangements shall apply to the covered employees.

(d) The requirements of this section shall be deemed satisfied by the payment of wages for weekly, biweekly, or semimonthly payroll if the wages are paid not more than seven calendar days following the close of the payroll period.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 220, all wages earned by employees directly employed by the Regents of the University of California shall be paid on a regular payday. For the employees on a monthly payment schedule, payment is due no later than five days after the close of the monthly payroll period. For employees on a more frequent payment schedule, payment is due according to the pay schedule announced by the University of California in advance. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the Regents of the University of California from allowing its employees to choose to distribute their pay so that they will receive paychecks throughout the year, rather than during pay periods worked only.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 508, Sec. 2.   (SB 698)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

204a.

When workers are engaged in an employment that normally involves working for several employers in the same industry interchangeably, and the several employers, or some of them, cooperate to establish a plan for the payment of wages at a central place or places and in accordance with a unified schedule of pay days, all the provisions of this chapter except 201, 202, and 208 shall apply. All such workers, including those who have been discharged and those who quit, shall receive their wages at such central place or places.

This section shall not apply to any such plan until 10 days after notice of their intention to set up such a plan shall have been given to the Labor Commissioner by the employers who cooperate to establish the plan. Having once been established, no such plan can be abandoned except after notice of their intention to abandon such plan has been given to the Labor Commissioner by the employers intending to abandon the plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

204b.

Section 204 shall be inapplicable to employees paid on a weekly basis on a regular day designated by the employer in advance of the rendition of services as the regular payday.

Labor performed by a weekly-paid employee during any calendar week and prior to or on the regular payday shall be paid for not later than the regular payday of the employer for such weekly-paid employee falling during the following calendar week.

Labor performed by a weekly-paid employee during any calendar week and subsequent to the regular payday shall be paid for not later than seven days after the regular payday of the employer for such weekly-paid employee falling during the following calendar week.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1564.)
-------------------------------------------

204c.

Section 204 shall be inapplicable to executive, administrative or professional employees who are not covered by any collective bargaining agreement, who are not subject to the Fair Labor Standards Act, whose monthly remuneration does not include overtime pay, and who are paid within seven days of the close of their monthly payroll period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 343.)
-------------------------------------------

204.1.

Commission wages paid to any person employed by an employer licensed as a vehicle dealer by the Department of Motor Vehicles are due and payable once during each calendar month on a day designated in advance by the employer as the regular payday. Commission wages are compensation paid to any person for services rendered in the sale of such employer’s property or services and based proportionately upon the amount or value thereof.

The provisions of this section shall not apply if there exists a collective bargaining agreement between the employer and his employees which provides for the date on which wages shall be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1967, Ch. 1170.)
-------------------------------------------

204.11.

Commission wages paid to any employee who is licensed pursuant to the Barbering and Cosmetology Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code) are due and payable at least twice during each calendar month on a day designated in advance by the employer as the regular payday. For any employee who is licensed pursuant to the Barbering and Cosmetology Act (Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code), wages that are paid to that employee for providing services for which such a license is required, when paid as a percentage or a flat sum portion of the sums paid to the employer by the client recipient of such service,
 and for selling goods, constitute commissions, provided that the employee is paid, in every pay period in which hours are worked, a regular base hourly rate of at least two times the state minimum wage rate for all hours worked in addition to commissions paid. The employee and employer may agree to a commission in addition to the base hourly rate. An employee may be compensated for rest and recovery periods at a rate of pay not less than the employee’s regular base hourly rate. Nothing in this section shall be interpreted
 to limit any rights or remedies otherwise available under state or federal law, including the right to overtime compensation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 831, Sec. 1.   (SB 490)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

204.2.

Salaries of executive, administrative, and professional employees of employers covered by the Fair Labor Standards Act, as set forth pursuant to Section 13(a)(1) of the Fair Labor Standards Act of 1938, as amended through March 1, 1969, (Title 29, Section 213(a)(1), United States Code) in Part 541 of Title 29 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as that part now reads, earned for labor performed in excess of 40 hours in a calendar week are due and payable on or before the 26th day of the calendar month immediately following the month in which such labor was performed. However, when such employees are covered by a collective bargaining agreement that provides different pay arrangements, those arrangements will apply to the covered employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1237.)
-------------------------------------------

204.3.

(a) An employee may receive, in lieu of overtime compensation, compensating time off at a rate of not less than one and one-half hours for each hour of employment for which overtime compensation is required by law. If an hour of employment would otherwise be compensable at a rate of more than one and one-half times the employee’s regular rate of compensation, then the employee may receive compensating time off commensurate with the higher rate.

(b) An employer may provide compensating time off under subdivision (a) if the following four conditions are met:

(1) The compensating time off is provided pursuant to applicable provisions of a collective bargaining agreement, memorandum of understanding, or other written agreement between the employer and the duly authorized representative of the employer’s employees; or, in the case of employees not covered by the aforementioned agreement or memorandum of understanding, pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the employer and employee before the performance of the work.

(2) The employee has not accrued compensating time in excess of the limit prescribed by subdivision (c).

(3) The employee has requested, in writing, compensating time off in lieu of overtime compensation.

(4) The employee is regularly scheduled to work no less than 40 hours in a workweek.

(c) (1) An employee may not accrue more than 240 hours of compensating time off. Any employee who has accrued 240 hours of compensating time off shall, for any additional overtime hours of work, be paid overtime compensation.

(2) If compensation is paid to an employee for accrued compensating time off, the compensation shall be paid at the regular rate earned by the employee at the time the employee receives payment.

(d) An employee who has accrued compensating time off authorized to be provided under subdivision (a) shall, upon termination of employment, be paid for the unused compensating time at a rate of compensation not less than the average regular rate received by the employee during the last three years of the employee’s employment, or the final regular rate received by the employee, whichever is higher.

(e) (1) An employee who has accrued compensating time off authorized to be provided under subdivision (a), and who has requested the use of that compensating time, shall be permitted by the employee’s employer to use the time within a reasonable period after making the request, if the use of the compensating time does not unduly disrupt the operations of the employer.

(2) Upon the request of an employee, the employer shall pay overtime compensation in cash in lieu of compensating time off for any compensating time off that has accrued for at least two pay periods.

(3) For purposes of determining whether a request to use compensating time has been granted within a reasonable period, the following factors shall be relevant:

(A) The normal schedule of work.

(B) Anticipated peak workloads based on past experience.

(C) Emergency requirements for staff and services.

(D) The availability of qualified substitute staff.

(f) Every employer shall keep records that accurately reflect compensating time earned and used.

(g) For purposes of this section, the terms “compensating time” and “compensating time off” mean hours during which an employee is not working, which are not counted as hours worked during the applicable workweek or other work period for purposes of overtime compensation, and for which the employee is compensated at the employee’s regular rate.

(h) This section shall not apply to any employee exempt from the overtime provisions of the California wage orders.

(i) This section shall not apply to any employee who is subject to the following wage orders of the Industrial Welfare Commission: Orders No. 8-80, 13-80, and 14-80 (affecting industries handling products after harvest, industries preparing agricultural products for market on the farm, and agricultural occupations), Order No. 3-80 (affecting the canning, freezing, and preserving industry), Orders No. 5-89 and 10-89 (affecting the public housekeeping and amusement and recreation industries), and Order No. 1-89 (affecting the manufacturing industry).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 544, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

205.

In agricultural, viticultural, and horticultural pursuits, in stock or poultry raising, and in household domestic service, when the employees in such employments are boarded and lodged by the employer, the wages due any employee remaining in such employment shall become due and payable once in each calendar month on a day designated in advance by the employer as the regular payday. No two successive paydays shall be more than 31 days apart, and the payment shall include all wages up to the regular payday. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, wages of workers employed by a farm labor contractor shall be paid on payroll periods at least once every week on a business day designated in advance by the farm labor contractor. Payment on such payday shall include all wages earned up to and including the fourth day before such payday.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------

205.5.

All wages, other than those mentioned in Sections 201 and 202, earned by any agricultural employee, as defined in Section 1140.4, are due and payable twice during each calendar month, on days designated in advance by the agricultural employer as the regular paydays. Labor performed between the 1st and the 15th days, inclusive, of any calendar month shall be paid between the 16th and the 22nd day of the month during which the labor was performed. Labor performed between the 16th and the last day, inclusive, of any calendar month shall be paid between the first and the seventh day of the following month. Agricultural employees, as used in this section, shall not include those employees who are covered by Section 205.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 92, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

206.

(a) In case of a dispute over wages, the employer shall pay, without condition and within the time set by this article, all wages, or parts thereof, conceded by him to be due, leaving to the employee all remedies he might otherwise be entitled to as to any balance claimed.

(b) If, after an investigation and hearing, the Labor Commissioner has determined the validity of any employee’s claim for wages, the claim is due and payable within 10 days after receipt of notice by the employer that such wages are due. Any employer having the ability to pay who willfully fails to pay such wages within 10 days shall, in addition to any other applicable penalty, pay treble the amount of any damages accruing to the employee as a direct and foreseeable consequence of such failure to pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 312.)
-------------------------------------------

206.5.

(a) An employer shall not require the execution of a release of a claim or right on account of wages due, or to become due, or made as an advance on wages to be earned, unless payment of those wages has been made. A release required or executed in violation of the provisions of this section shall be null and void as between the employer and the employee. Violation of this section by the employer is a misdemeanor.

(b) For purposes of this section, “execution of a release” includes requiring an employee, as a condition of being paid, to execute a statement of the hours he or she worked during a pay period which the employer knows to be false.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 224, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

207.

Every employer shall keep posted conspicuously at the place of work, if practicable, or otherwise where it can be seen as employees come or go to their places of work, or at the office or nearest agency for payment kept by the employer, a notice specifying the regular pay days and the time and place of payment, in accordance with this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

208.

Every employee who is discharged shall be paid at the place of discharge, and every employee who quits shall be paid at the office or agency of the employer in the county where the employee has been performing labor. All payments shall be made in the manner provided by law.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

209.

In the event of any strike, the unpaid wages earned by striking employees shall become due and payable on the next regular pay day, and the payment or settlement thereof shall include all amounts due the striking employees without abatement or reduction. The employer shall return to each striking employee any deposit, money, or other guaranty required by him from the employee for the faithful performance of the duties of the employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

210.

(a) In addition to, and entirely independent and apart from, any other penalty provided in this article, every person who fails to pay the wages of each employee as provided in Sections 201.3, 204, 204b, 204.1, 204.2, 204.11, 205, 205.5, and 1197.5, shall be subject to a penalty as follows:

(1) For any initial violation, one hundred dollars ($100) for each failure to pay each employee.

(2) For each subsequent violation, or
 any willful or intentional violation, two hundred dollars ($200) for each failure to pay each employee, plus 25 percent of the amount unlawfully withheld.

(b) The penalty shall either be recovered by the employee as a statutory penalty pursuant to Section 98 or by the Labor Commissioner as a civil penalty through the issuance of a citation or pursuant to Section 98.3. The procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations issued by the Labor Commissioner under this section shall be the same as those set forth in subdivisions (b) through (k), inclusive, of Section 1197.1.
